Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 15. Banking Offenses.

§ 6.2-938.
Engaging in banking business without authority; Commission may examine accounts of suspected person; penalty.

Every person who trades or deals as a bank, or carries on banking, without authority of law, and their officers and agents, is guilty of a Class 6 felony.

The Commission shall have authority to examine the accounts, books, and papers of any person who it has reason to suspect is doing a banking business, in order to ascertain whether such person has violated, or is violating, any provision of this title. The refusal to submit such accounts, books, and papers shall be prima facie evidence of such violation.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-133; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-111; 1992, c. 136; 1994, c. 7; 2010, c. 794.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 6.2-939.
Unlawful use of terms indicating that business is bank; penalty.

A person not authorized to engage in the banking business in the Commonwealth by the provisions of this title or under the laws of the United States, shall not (i) use any office sign having thereon any name or other words indicating that any such office is the office of a bank; (ii) use or circulate any letterheads, billheads, blank notes, blank receipts, certificates, circulars, or any written or printed paper, having thereon any name or word indicating that such person is a bank; or (iii) use the word “bank,” “banking,” “banker,” or “trust,” or the equivalent thereof in any foreign language, or the plural thereof in connection with any business other than a banking business.

The foregoing prohibitions shall not apply to use by a bank holding company, as defined in §

6.2-800

, of the word “bank,” “banks,” “banking,” “banker,” “trust,” or the equivalent thereof in its name, or of a name similar to that of a subsidiary bank of such bank holding company.

The use of the above-mentioned words in the name of, or in connection with, any other business shall not be prohibited if the context or remaining words show clearly and definitely that the business is not a bank, and is not carrying on a banking business.

Any person violating the provisions of this section, either individually or as an interested party, is guilty of a Class 6 felony.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-134; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-112; 1972, c. 187; 1992, cc. 24, 136; 2000, c. 56; 2003, c. 592; 2010, c. 794.

Cross references.

As to requirements of business trust names, see §

13.1-1214

.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 6.2-940.
Making derogatory statements affecting banks; penalty.

Any person who willfully and maliciously makes, circulates, or transmits to another any statement, rumor, or suggestion that is directly or by reference derogatory to the financial condition, or affects the solvency or financial standing of, any bank doing business in the Commonwealth, or who counsels, aids, procures, or induces another to start, transmit, or circulate any such statement or rumor, is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-132; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-119; 1991, c. 710; 2010, c. 794.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Libel and Slander, § 49.

§ 6.2-941.
Use of bank name, logo, or symbol for marketing purposes; penalty.

As used in this section, “name, logo, or symbol, or any combination thereof, of a bank” includes any name, logo, or symbol, or any combination thereof, that is deceptively similar to the name, logo, or symbol, or any combination thereof of a bank.

Except as provided in subsection C, no person shall use the name, logo, or symbol, or any combination thereof, of a bank in marketing material provided to or solicitation of another person in a manner such that a reasonable person may believe that the marketing material or solicitation originated from or is endorsed by the bank or that the bank is responsible for the marketing material or solicitation.

This section shall not apply to (i) an affiliate or agent of the bank or (ii) a person who uses the name, logo, or symbol of a bank with the consent of the bank.

Any person violating the provisions of this section, either individually or as an interested party, is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. This section shall not affect the availability of any remedies otherwise available to a bank.

History.

2005, c. 240, § 6.1-119.1; 2010, c. 794.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

As to remedies for use of name, logo or symbol of bank or trust company, etc., see § 59.1-92.22.

§ 6.2-942.
False certification of checks; penalty.

Any officer, employee, agent, or director of a bank who (i) certifies a check drawn on such bank and willfully fails forthwith to charge the amount thereof against the account of the drawer thereof or (ii) willfully certifies a check drawn on such bank when the drawer of such check does not have on deposit with the bank the amount of money subject to the payment of such check, is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-136; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-120; 2010, c. 794.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 6.2-943.
Offenses by officer, director, agent, or employee of bank; penalties.

Any officer, director, agent, or employee of any bank who embezzles, abstracts, or willfully misapplies any of the moneys, funds, or credits of, or in the possession or control of, the bank is guilty of larceny and subject to the penalties provided in §

18.2-95

or

18.2-96

.

Any officer, director, agent, or employee of any bank who (i) issues or puts forth any certificate of deposit, (ii) draws any order or bill of exchange, (iii) makes any acceptance, (iv) assigns any note, bond, draft, bill of exchange, mortgage, judgment, decree, or other instrument in writing, or (v) makes any false entry in any book, report, or statement of such bank, with intent in any case to injure or defraud the bank or any other individual or entity, or to deceive any officer of the bank or the Commission, or any agent or examiner authorized to examine the affairs of the bank, and any person, who, with the same intent, aids or abets any such officer, director, agent, or employee of such bank in any act described in clauses (i) through (v), is guilty of a Class 5 felony.

Any officer of a bank who knowingly makes a false statement of the condition of any bank is guilty of a Class 5 felony.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 6-128, 6-138; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-122; 1974, c. 665; 2010, c. 794.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 5 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 6.2-944.
Officers, directors, agents, and employees violating or causing bank to violate laws; civil liability not affected.

Any officer, director, agent, or employee of any bank who knowingly violates or who knowingly causes any bank to violate any provision of this chapter, or knowingly participates or knowingly acquiesces in any such violation, unless other punishment is provided for the offense of such officer, agent, or employee, is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. The provisions of this section shall not affect the civil liability of any such officer, director, agent, or employee.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-139; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-123; 1974, c. 665; 2010, c. 794.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 6.2-945.
Receiving deposit knowing bank to be insolvent; penalty.

Any officer, director. or employee of any bank, or broker, who takes and receives, or permits to be received, a deposit from any person with the actual knowledge that the bank or broker is at the time insolvent, is guilty of embezzlement. Notwithstanding the provisions of §

18.2-111

, an individual convicted of embezzlement pursuant to this section shall be fined double the amount so received and be subject to a term of imprisonment of not less than one nor more than three years, in the discretion of the jury, for each offense.

On the trial of any indictment under this section, it shall be the duty of the bank or broker, and its agent or officers, to produce in court, on demand of the attorney for the Commonwealth, all books and papers of the bank or broker, to be read as evidence on the trial of such indictment. In determining the question of the solvency of any bank, the capital stock thereof shall not be considered as a liability due by it.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-3; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-124; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-946.
Civil penalties for violation of Commission’s orders.

The Commission may impose, enter judgment for, and enforce by its process, a civil penalty not exceeding $10,000 upon any bank, or against any of its directors, officers, or employees, who it determines, in proceedings commenced in accordance with the Commission’s Rules, has violated any lawful order of the Commission.

The Commission may remove from office any director or officer of a bank for a second or subsequent violation by him of any such order.

In all cases the defendant shall have an opportunity to be heard and to introduce evidence, and the right to appeal as provided by law.

History.

1968, c. 791, § 6.1-125; 1974, c. 665; 1976, c. 658; 2010, c. 794.